Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.32.020

Premeditation—Limitations.

(1) As used in this chapter, the premeditation required in order to support a conviction of the crime of murder in the first degree must involve more than a moment in point of time.

(2) Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect RCW 46.61.520.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.32.020.]